Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2509
Report.

The department shall provide a report evaluating the expanded learning opportunity programs to the Legislature by January 1 of each odd-numbered year. The report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 23.